Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.200

Chapter not to affect dispositions under juvenile justice act.

No provision of this chapter shall authorize a court to suspend or defer the imposition or the execution of a disposition under chapter 13.40 RCW, as now law or hereafter amended.

[ 1981 c 299 s 21.]